Vermont, session 2025-2026, S33.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. COMMUNITY NURSE PROGRAM PILOT SERVING AGING
VERMONTERS
(a) $450,000.00 shall be appropriated to the Department of Disabilities,
Aging, and Independent Living for the purpose of establishing a two-year pilot
to enhance the provision of services by one or more existing community nurse
programs to aging Vermonters in the program’s region.
(b) The Department shall seek and consider applications for participation in
the pilot described in this section from existing community nurse programs
VT LEG #378741 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.33
2025 Page 2 of 2
serving aging Vermonters in the program’s region. The Department shall
select one or more programs, as funding permits, to participate in the pilot
based on a program’s application materials. A successful application shall
include a plan to:
(1) create a community health worker position to serve program clients;
(2) expand the program’s nursing services to serve a greater percentage
of aging Vermonters in the program’s region, including ensuring that nurse
home visits are not limited in number or duration;
(3) identify and fill the program’s coverage gaps;
(4) integrate enhanced administrative support within the program; and
(5) develop a system to obtain relevant data and document program
needs, outcomes, and processes.
(c) On or before December 15, 2027, a program participating in the pilot
described in this section shall submit a report to the Department detailing the
number of aging Vermonters served, program gaps, recommended program
improvements, and any other data relevant to the pilot.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378741 v.1